Hawaii statutes.
§438-8 Requisites for admission to
examinations. (a) The executive secretary of the board shall determine
the sufficiency of the preliminary qualifications of barber applicants for
admission to examinations.

(b) The board shall contract with a professional
testing service to have the testing service prepare and provide examinations
for applicants as may be required for the purposes of this chapter. The
examinations shall not be confined to any specific system or method, and the
examinations shall be consistent with the practical and theoretical
requirements as provided by this chapter.

(c) Every applicant who is required by the
board to be examined shall pay an examination fee as provided in rules adopted
by the director pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1947, c 194, §8; RL 1955, §58-8; am
L 1967, c 96, §1; HRS §438-8; am L 1979, c 8, §1; am L 1983, c 240, §5; am L
1986, c 138, §4; am L 1987, c 246, §6; am L 1993, c 264, §5]

Cross References

Disposal of examination records, see §94-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next